Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5897.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "Michigan PFAS action response team act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Department" means the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (b) "MPART" means the Michigan PFAS action response team created under section 3. (c) "PFAS" means a perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl substance and includes any member of the class of fluorinated organic chemicals that contains at least 1 fully fluorinated carbon atom. Sec. 5. (1) The Michigan PFAS action response team is established. MPART consists of the following members: (a) The director of the department. (b) The director of the department of health and human services. (c) The director of the department of military and veterans affairs. (d) The director of the department of agriculture and rural development. (e) The director of the department of natural resources. (f) The director of the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (g) The director of the state transportation department. (2) A designee of a director described under subsection (1) may serve as a member of MPART instead of the director. The director of the department or the director's designee shall serve as the chairperson of MPART. (3) The department shall assist MPART in the performance of its duties and provide personnel to staff MPART. The budgeting, procurement, or related management functions of MPART must be performed under the direction and supervision of the director of the department. (4) MPART shall adopt procedures consistent with applicable statutes to govern its organization and operations. (5) A majority of the members of MPART serving constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at a meeting of MPART. A majority of the members present and serving is required for official action of MPART. (6) A meeting of MPART must be called by the chairperson or as otherwise provided in procedures adopted by MPART. (7) MPART may establish advisory workgroups composed of individuals or entities participating in MPART activities or other members of the public as considered necessary by MPART to assist MPART in performing its duties. MPART may adopt, reject, or modify a recommendation proposed by an advisory workgroup. (8) Members of MPART shall serve without compensation but may receive reimbursement for necessary travel and expenses in accordance with applicable statutes and the rules and procedures of the civil service commission and the department of technology, management, and budget, subject to available funding. (9) MPART may accept donations of labor, services, or other items of value from any public or private person. MPART shall expend donations in compliance with applicable statutes, rules, and procedures. (10) Members of MPART shall coordinate all legal, legislative, and media contacts that directly involve the work of MPART. Sec. 7. (1) MPART shall provide recommendations to the director of the department and the heads of other departments or agencies and coordinate activities among departments and agencies. (2) MPART shall research, identify, recommend, and implement PFAS response actions relative to the discovery of, communication about, and mitigation of PFAS. MPART shall do all of the following with respect to PFAS: (a) Identify sites affected by PFAS and create and implement an action plan designed to assist state and local authorities to ensure safe land, air, and water. (b) Continue to develop, as needed, environmental specialized site plans and response protocols for all identified sites contaminated by PFAS. (c) Continue to develop, as needed, public health protocols to ensure that all public health and medical stakeholder groups are informed and integrated into the PFAS response, to ascertain health implications. (d) Perform state and local public outreach to ensure that persons in the affected areas, including residents, local governments, tribal governments, corporate and nonprofit partners, and affected stakeholders are informed, educated, and empowered to assist in the PFAS response. (e) Conduct long-term mitigation planning and ensure that resource requirements are identified and supported and that site contaminants are removed, as appropriate. (f) Establish a standard process for communicating and sharing pertinent information between members of MPART and stakeholders. (g) Establish routine communication protocols at the local, executive, and legislative levels, as appropriate. (h) Establish an information protocol to effectively inform the public about PFAS and the activities of MPART. (i) Establish information sharing and communications processes with other state and federal entities involved in PFAS response activities. (j) Collaboratively develop standards on health impacts for the affected population. (k) Assess the status of any site contaminated by PFAS and develop individualized response strategies. (l) Identify funding for PFAS identification and remediation efforts, including federal grants, legislative appropriations, and private partners. (m) Create measurable goals and objectives along an established timeline. (n) Recommend changes to state laws regarding PFAS. (o) Recommend structural changes necessary to address other threats to the environment and public health and safety identified while MPART performs its duties. (p) Perform other duties as requested by the director of the department or the governor. (3) MPART may, as appropriate to perform its duties, make inquiries, conduct studies, undertake investigations, hold hearings, consult with federal agencies, and receive comments from the public. To perform its duties, MPART may also consult with and retain outside experts, including, but not limited to, experts in the private sector, in government agencies, and at institutions of higher education. (4) MPART may hire or retain contractors, subcontractors, advisors, consultants, and agents, and may make and enter into contracts necessary or incidental to the exercise of its powers or the performance of its duties as the director of the department considers advisable and necessary, consistent with applicable statutes, rules, and procedures and subject to available funding. Sec. 9. All departments, committees, commissioners, and officers of this state shall, consistent with applicable statutes, give to MPART, or to any member or representative of MPART, both of the following: (a) Any necessary assistance required by MPART. (b) Free access to any books, records, or documents in their custody that relate to matters within the scope of inquiry, study, or review of MPART. Enacting section 1. This act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.